Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2291
Misdemeanor domestic violence conviction; notification to defendant; State Court Administrator's Office; duty.

(1) When sentencing a person convicted of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(33), as such section existed on July 18, 2008, the court shall provide written or oral notification to the defendant that it may be a violation of federal law for the individual: To ship or transport in interstate or foreign commerce, or possess in or affecting commerce, any firearm or ammunition; or to receive any firearm or ammunition which has been shipped or transported in interstate or foreign commerce.

(2) The State Court Administrator's Office shall create a standard notification that provides the information in subsection (1) of this section and shall provide a copy of such notification to all judges in this state.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 17.